District of Columbia statutes.
44-420

Fees.

(a)

The SHPDA shall collect application fees from persons that request a certificate of need. The fee required for an application shall be the greater of 3% of the proposed capital expenditure or $5,000, with a maximum of $300,000. The SHPDA is authorized to establish a fee schedule for certain data, analyses and reports published by the SHPDA from the HPDS. The annual user fee for private hospitals shall be $4 per inpatient admission, based on the previous calendar year’s admission data, to be paid to the SHPDA on a quarterly basis, in lieu of a certificate of need application fee. The certificate of need application fee for any project receiving funds through the Medical Homes DC initiative, as operated by the District of Columbia Primary Care Association, shall be $5,000. User fees may also be established for other classes of facilities by regulation. SHPDA may adjust a user fee periodically to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index issued by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the maximum application fee that may be collected from Specialty Hospitals of America, LLC, or certain of its subsidiary entities, for facilities located in Lots 3 and 4, Square 5919, related to the acquisition of Greater Southeast Community Hospital shall be $300,000.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 21, 43 DCR 4535
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2002(d), 49 DCR 11664
Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-149, § 2(h), 51 DCR 2802
Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-116, § 2, 55 DCR 1280
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-167, § 3, 55 DCR 5178

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-402 and § 44-420.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-370.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-307 substituted “3% of the proposed capital expenditure or $5,000, with a maximum of $300,000” for “1% of the proposed capital expenditure or $2, 000, with a maximum of $25,000”.
D.C. Law 15-149 added three new sentences at the end to read: “The annual user fee for private hospitals shall be $4 per inpatient admission, based on the previous calendar year’s admission data, to be paid to the SHPDA on a quarterly basis, in lieu of a certificate of need application fee. User fees may also be established for other classes of facilities by regulation. SHPDA may adjust a user fee periodically to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index issued by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor.”
D.C. Law 17-116 inserted “The certificate of need application fee for any project receiving funds through the Medical Homes DC initiative, as operated by the District of Columbia Primary Care Association, shall be $5,000.”
D.C. Law 17-167 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Health Services Planning and Development Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-19, June 21, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5463).
Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-71 designated the existing text as subsec. (a) and added subsec. (b) to read as follows: “(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the maximum application fee that may be collected from Specialty Hospitals of America, LLC, or certain of its subsidiary entities, for facilities located in Lots 3 and 4, Square 5919, related to the acquisition of Greater Southeast Community Hospital shall be $300,000.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 17-71 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2002(d) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Health Services Planning and Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-49, March 28, 2003, 50 DCR 2943).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Health Services Planning and Development Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-87, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4325).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2002(d) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Health Services Planning and Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-322, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of East of the River Hospital Revitalization Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-168, October 19, 2007, 54 DCR 10978).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Health Services Planning Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-234, December 27, 2007, 55 DCR 238).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of East of the River Hospital Revitalization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-249, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1255).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Health Services Planning Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-319, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3430).